Massachusetts, session 194th, S1682.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 2AAAAAA the following section:- 
Section 2BBBBBB. (a) There shall be established and set upon the books of the 
commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Automatic External Defibrillator Trust Fund. 
The secretary of public safety and security shall administer the fund and make expenditures from 
the fund in the form of grants to municipalities, public colleges and universities, and corporations 
for charitable purposes as defined by section 2 of chapter 180 of the general laws, for the 
purchase of automated external defibrillators for public safety and first responder vehicles. The 
fund shall be credited with: (i) any revenue from appropriations or other monies authorized by 
the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) any gifts, grants, 

of 2 11 private contributions or investment income earned on the assets of the fund; and (iii) revenues, 
not more than $1,000,000 in a calendar year.  Any money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year 
shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent 
fiscal years. The secretary shall annually, not later than December 31, report on the activity of 
the fund to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the senate and house 
committees on ways and means. 
(b) There shall be a public safety vehicle equipment surcharge of $0.50 imposed upon 
each vehicular rental transaction in the commonwealth. The surcharge shall be deposited in the 
Automatic External Defibrillator Trust Fund established in this section; provided, however, that 
not more than $1,000,000 collected from the surcharge in a calendar year be deposited into the 
fund; and provided further, that any amount collected from the surcharge above $1,000,000 in a 
calendar year shall be deposited into the General Fund. The surcharge shall not apply to 
transportation network companies or to rental periods of less than 24 hours that are charged on 
an hourly basis. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.